Florida, session 2026, SB7038.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 117 118 Section 1.âSubsection (9) of section 251.001, Florida 119 Statutes, is amended to read: 120 251.001âFlorida State Guard Act.â 121 (9)âREIMBURSEMENT, BENEFIT, AND COMPENSATION.â 122 (a)âThe division shall reimburse members of the Florida 123 State Guard for per diem and travel expenses incurred to attend 124 required training or in the course of active service as provided 125 in s. 112.061. 126 (b)âMembers of the Florida State Guard may be compensated 127 for time spent training or in the course of active service at 128 rates established by the director, subject to appropriation. 129 (c)âA member of the Florida State Guard may not make any 130 purchase or enter into any contract or agreement for purchases 131 or services as a charge against the state without the authority 132 of the director. 133 (d)âAs a benefit to the active members of the Florida State 134 Guard, subject to approval by the director of the Division of 135 the State Guard, each Florida College System institution and 136 state university shall waive tuition and fees for active members 137 of the Florida State Guard to enroll for up to 6 credit hours of 138 courses per term on a space-available basis. 139 Section 2.âSection 413.0114, Florida Statutes, is created 140 to read: 141 413.0114âConsumer disclosure for blind-related services.â 142 (1)âAn individual, business, nonprofit, or other entity 143 offering fee-based services to individuals who are blind or 144 visually impaired shall, before entering into a contract or 145 accepting payment, disclose in writing whether equivalent or 146 substantially similar services may be available at no cost 147 through the Division of Blind Services or another public agency. 148 (2)âThe written disclosure must: 149 (a)âBe provided in plain language and, upon request, in an 150 accessible format, such as braille, large print, or audio. 151 (b)âInclude contact information for the Division of Blind 152 Services. 153 (c)âBe signed or electronically acknowledged by the 154 consumer or his or her representative. 155 (3)âA violation of this section constitutes an unfair or 156 deceptive trade practice under part II of chapter 501 and is 157 subject to penalties and enforcement as provided therein. 158 (4)âThe State Board of Education may adopt rules to 159 implement this section. 160 Section 3.âSubsection (1) of section 413.208, Florida 161 Statutes, is amended to read: 162 413.208âService providers; quality assurance; fitness for 163 responsibilities; background screening.â 164 (1)âService providers must apply to register with the 165 division. To qualify for approval, a registration, the division 166 must ensure that the service provider must maintain maintains an 167 internal system of quality assurance, have has proven functional 168 systems, meet the minimum qualifications, and be is subject to a 169 due-diligence inquiry as to its fitness to undertake service 170 responsibilities. 171 (a)âThe division shall establish minimum qualifications for 172 service providers. The division shall establish an annual 173 application period for service providers to submit applications. 174 The division may approve or deny any service provider 175 application. Beginning January 1, 2027, only service providers 176 that meet the minimum qualifications established by the division 177 and that have been approved to provide employment-related 178 services to individuals with disabilities may participate in the 179 vocational rehabilitation program. 180 (b)âThe division shall develop and make publicly available 181 an annual report of service provider effectiveness, which 182 includes an evaluation system measuring the effectiveness of all 183 service providers that are approved by the division to provide 184 employment-related services to individuals with disabilities. 185 (c)âIn order to maintain approved status with the division, 186 service providers must meet minimum standards of effectiveness 187 in the provision of vocational rehabilitation services, 188 including placement of individuals in competitive and integrated 189 employment. 190 (d)âRates for vocational rehabilitation services must be 191 allocable, reasonable, and necessary, as determined by the 192 division. 193 Section 4.âParagraph (c) of subsection (3) of section 194 491.005, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 195 491.005âLicensure by examination.â 196 (3)âMARRIAGE AND FAMILY THERAPY.âUpon verification of 197 documentation and payment of a fee not to exceed $200, as set by 198 board rule, the department shall issue a license as a marriage 199 and family therapist to an applicant whom the board certifies 200 has met all of the following criteria: 201 (c)1.âAttained one of the following: 202 a.âA minimum of a masterâs degree in marriage and family 203 therapy from a program accredited by the Commission on 204 Accreditation for Marriage and Family Therapy Education. 205 b.âA minimum of a masterâs degree with a major emphasis in 206 marriage and family therapy or a closely related field from a 207 university program accredited by the Council on Accreditation of 208 Counseling and Related Educational Programs and graduate courses 209 approved by the board. 210 c.âA minimum of a masterâs degree with an emphasis in 211 marriage and family therapy or a closely related field, with a 212 degree conferred before September 1, 2032 2027, from an 213 institutionally accredited college or university and graduate 214 courses approved by the board. 215 2.âIf the course title that appears on the applicantâs 216 transcript does not clearly identify the content of the 217 coursework, the applicant provided additional documentation, 218 including, but not limited to, a syllabus or catalog description 219 published for the course. The required masterâs degree must have 220 been received in an institution of higher education that, at the 221 time the applicant graduated, was fully accredited by an 222 institutional accrediting body recognized by the Council for 223 Higher Education Accreditation or its successor organization or 224 was a member in good standing with Universities Canada, or an 225 institution of higher education located outside the United 226 States and Canada which, at the time the applicant was enrolled 227 and at the time the applicant graduated, maintained a standard 228 of training substantially equivalent to the standards of 229 training of those institutions in the United States which are 230 accredited by an institutional accrediting body recognized by 231 the Council for Higher Education Accreditation or its successor 232 organization. Such foreign education and training must have been 233 received in an institution or program of higher education 234 officially recognized by the government of the country in which 235 it is located as an institution or program to train students to 236 practice as professional marriage and family therapists or 237 psychotherapists. The applicant has the burden of establishing 238 that the requirements of this provision have been met, and the 239 board shall require documentation, such as an evaluation by a 240 foreign equivalency determination service, as evidence that the 241 applicantâs graduate degree program and education were 242 equivalent to an accredited program in this country. An 243 applicant with a masterâs degree from a program that did not 244 emphasize marriage and family therapy may complete the 245 coursework requirement in a training institution fully 246 accredited by the Commission on Accreditation for Marriage and 247 Family Therapy Education recognized by the United States 248 Department of Education. 249 250 For the purposes of dual licensure, the department shall license 251 as a marriage and family therapist any person who meets the 252 requirements of s. 491.0057. Fees for dual licensure may not 253 exceed those stated in this subsection. 254 Section 5.âParagraph (d) of subsection (2) of section 255 1001.7065, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 256 1001.7065âPreeminent state research universities program.â 257 (2)âACADEMIC AND RESEARCH EXCELLENCE STANDARDS.âThe 258 following academic and research excellence standards are 259 established for the preeminent state research universities 260 program and shall be reported annually in the Board of Governors 261 Accountability Plan: 262 (d)âA 4-year graduation rate of 60 percent or higher and an 263 adjusted cohort graduation rate for full-time, first-time-in 264 college students. 265 Section 6.âSubsection (1) of section 1001.92, Florida 266 Statutes, is amended to read: 267 1001.92âState University System Performance-Based 268 Incentive.â 269 (1)âA State University System Performance-Based Incentive 270 shall be awarded to state universities using performance-based 271 metrics adopted by the Board of Governors of the State 272 University System. Beginning with the Board of Governorsâ 273 determination of each universityâs performance improvement and 274 achievement ratings, and the related distribution of annual 275 fiscal year appropriation, the performance-based metrics must 276 include: 277 (a)âThe 4-year graduation rate and adjusted cohort 278 graduation rate for first-time-in-college students; 279 (b)âBeginning in fiscal year 2022-2023, the 3-year 280 graduation rate for associate in arts transfer students; 281 (c)âRetention rates; 282 (d)âPostgraduation education rates; 283 (e)âDegree production; 284 (f)âAffordability; 285 (g)âPostgraduation employment and salaries, including wage 286 thresholds that reflect the added value of a baccalaureate 287 degree; 288 (h)âAccess rate, based on the percentage of first-year 289 undergraduate students enrolled during the fall term who 290 received a Pell Grant during the fall term; and 291 (i)âBeginning in fiscal year 2021-2022, the 6-year 292 graduation rate for students who are awarded a Pell Grant in 293 their first year. 294 295 The Board of Governors may approve other metrics in a publicly 296 noticed meeting. The board shall adopt benchmarks to evaluate 297 each state universityâs performance on the metrics to measure 298 the state universityâs achievement of institutional excellence 299 or need for improvement and minimum requirements for eligibility 300 to receive performance funding. Benchmarks and metrics may not 301 be adjusted after university performance data has been received 302 by the Board of Governors. 303 Section 7.âSection 1003.437, Florida Statutes, is amended 304 to read: 305 1003.437âMiddle and high school grading system.âThe grading 306 system and interpretation of letter grades used to measure 307 student success in grade 6 through grade 12 courses for students 308 in public schools shall be as follows: 309 (1)âGrade âAâ equals 90 percent through 100 percent, has a 310 grade point average value of 4, and is defined as âoutstanding 311 progress.â 312 (2)âGrade âBâ equals 80 percent through 89 percent, has a 313 grade point average value of 3, and is defined as âabove average 314 progress.â 315 (3)âGrade âCâ equals 70 percent through 79 percent, has a 316 grade point average value of 2, and is defined as âaverage 317 progress.â 318 (4)âGrade âDâ equals 60 percent through 69 percent, has a 319 grade point average value of 1, and is defined as âlowest 320 acceptable progress.â 321 (5)âGrade âFâ equals zero percent through 59 percent, has a 322 grade point average value of zero, and is defined as âfailure.â 323 (6)âGrade âIâ equals zero percent, has a grade point 324 average value of zero, and is defined as âincomplete.â 325 326 The State Board of Education shall establish a statewide uniform 327 weighted grading system for honors courses and articulated 328 acceleration mechanisms identified in s. 1007.27. For the 329 purposes of class ranking, District school boards shall use the 330 may exercise a weighted grading system to calculate weighted 331 high school grade point averages pursuant to s. 1007.271. 332 Section 8.âSection 1004.0983, Florida Statutes, is created 333 to read: 334 1004.0983âPublic postsecondary safety policies and 335 procedures.â 336 (1)âEach state university and Florida College System 337 institution shall adopt and implement written safety policies 338 and procedures applicable to campus facilities, classrooms, and 339 other institutional settings to prevent, report, and respond to: 340 (a)âAn act of violence or attempted violence against a 341 person. 342 (b)âA credible threat as defined in s. 784.048(1)(c). 343 (2)âThe policies and procedures must: 344 (a)âIdentify a person responsible for: 345 1.âCoordinating the state universityâs or Florida College 346 System institutionâs response to actions listed in paragraphs 347 (1)(a) and (b). 348 2.âImplementing such policies and procedures, including all 349 safety measures. 350 (b)âEstablish clear internal and external reporting 351 protocols, including notification of campus security or a local 352 law enforcement agency when appropriate. 353 (c)âOutline the protective measures available to affected 354 persons, which may include work or class relocation, security 355 escorts, and restricting access to certain areas by a person 356 engaged in an activity listed in paragraph (1)(a) or paragraph 357 (1)(b). 358 (d)âProvide timely updates to an affected person regarding 359 the status of an incident and any action taken. 360 (e)âEnsure the policies and procedures are prominently 361 posted on the state universityâs or Florida College System 362 institutionâs website and available to students, faculty, staff, 363 and visitors upon request. 364 (3)âEach state university and Florida College System 365 institution shall annually review and update the policies and 366 procedures to incorporate the best practices in threat 367 assessment, campus security, and safety. 368 (4)âThe Board of Governors may adopt regulations and the 369 State Board of Education may adopt rules to administer this 370 section. 371 Section 9.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 372 1005.06, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 373 1005.06âInstitutions not under the jurisdiction or purview 374 of the commission.â 375 (1)âExcept as otherwise provided in law, the following 376 institutions are not under the jurisdiction or purview of the 377 commission and are not required to obtain licensure: 378 (b)âAny college or, school, or course licensed or approved 379 as an institution for establishment and operation by another 380 state agency. A college or school, or any of its programs or 381 courses, does not qualify for exemption from the commissionâs 382 jurisdiction under this paragraph solely because another state 383 agency licenses or approves one or more of its programs or 384 courses. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to limit 385 or affect the exemptions for contract training, continuing 386 education, or professional development programs or courses under 387 paragraph (d), even if such programs or courses are approved 388 under chapter 466 for establishment and operation under part I 389 of chapter 464, chapter 466, or chapter 475, or any other 390 chapter of the Florida Statutes requiring licensing or approval 391 as defined in this chapter. 392 Section 10.âParagraph (b) of subsection (9) of section 393 1007.25, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 394 1007.25âGeneral education courses; common prerequisites; 395 other degree requirements.â 396 (9) 397 (b)âAn associate in arts specialized transfer degree must 398 include 36 semester hours of general education coursework and 399 require 60 semester hours or more of college credit. Specialized 400 transfer degrees are designed for Florida College System 401 institution students who need supplemental lower-level 402 coursework in preparation for transfer to another institution. 403 The State Board of Education shall establish criteria for the 404 review and approval of new specialized transfer degrees. The 405 approval process must require: 406 1.âA Florida College System institution to submit a notice 407 of its intent to propose a new associate in arts specialized 408 degree program to the Division of Florida Colleges. The notice 409 must include the recommended credit hours, the rationale for the 410 specialization, the demand for students entering the field, and 411 the coursework being proposed to be included beyond the 60 412 semester hours required for the general transfer degree, if 413 applicable. Notices of intent may be submitted by a Florida 414 College System institution at any time. 415 2.âThe Division of Florida Colleges to forward the notice 416 of intent within 10 business days after receipt to all Florida 417 College System institutions and to the Chancellor of the State 418 University System, who shall forward the notice to all state 419 universities. State universities and Florida College System 420 institutions shall have 30 60 days after receipt of the notice 421 to submit comments to the proposed associate in arts specialized 422 transfer degree. 423 3.âAfter the submission of comments pursuant to 424 subparagraph 2., the requesting Florida College System 425 institution to submit a proposal that, at a minimum, includes: 426 a.âEvidence that the coursework for the associate in arts 427 specialized transfer degree includes demonstration of competency 428 in a foreign language pursuant to s. 1007.262 and demonstration 429 of civic literacy competency as provided in subsection (5). 430 b.âDemonstration that all required coursework will count 431 toward the associate in arts degree or the baccalaureate degree. 432 c.âAn analysis of demand and unmet need for students 433 entering the specialized field of study at the baccalaureate 434 level. 435 d.âJustification for the program length if it exceeds 60 436 credit hours, including references to the common prerequisite 437 manual or other requirements for the baccalaureate degree. This 438 includes documentation of alignment between the exit 439 requirements of a Florida College System institution and the 440 admissions requirements of a baccalaureate program at a state 441 university to which students would typically transfer. 442 e.âArticulation agreements for graduates of the associate 443 in arts specialized transfer degree. 444 f.âResponses to the comments received under subparagraph 2. 445 Section 11.âSubsections (1) and (16) of section 1007.271, 446 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 447 1007.271âDual enrollment programs.â 448 (1)âThe dual enrollment program is the enrollment of an 449 eligible secondary student in this state or home education 450 student in this state in a postsecondary course creditable 451 toward high school completion and a career certificate or an 452 associate or baccalaureate degree. Postsecondary institutions 453 that are eligible to participate in the dual enrollment program 454 are Florida public postsecondary institutions and eligible not 455 for-profit independent colleges and universities pursuant to s. 456 1011.62(1)(i). A student who is enrolled in postsecondary 457 instruction that is not creditable toward a high school diploma 458 may not be classified as a dual enrollment student. 459 (16)âStudents who meet the eligibility requirements of this 460 section and who choose to participate in dual enrollment 461 programs are exempt from the payment of registration, tuition, 462 and laboratory fees. 463 Section 12.âSubsections (2) and (3) and paragraphs (a) and 464 (b) of subsection (4) of section 1008.30, Florida Statutes, are 465 amended to read: 466 1008.30âAssessing college-level communication and 467 computation skills for public postsecondary education.â 468 (2)âBy January 31, 2022, the State Board of Education shall 469 adopt rules to develop and implement alternative methods for 470 assessing the basic communication and computation skills of 471 students who intend to enter a degree program at a Florida 472 College System institution. Florida College System institutions 473 and school district career centers may use these alternative 474 methods adopted by the State Board of Education for assessing 475 the basic communication and computation skills of students who 476 intend to enter a degree program at a Florida College System 477 institution or school district career center in lieu of the 478 common placement tests under subsection (1) to assess student 479 readiness for college-level work in communication and 480 computation. Florida College System institutions may request 481 approval of institution-specific alternative methods in 482 accordance with State Board of Education rules. 483 (3)âThe rules adopted under subsection (2) must specify the 484 following: 485 (a)âA student who entered 9th grade in a Florida public 486 school in the 2003-2004 school year, or any year thereafter, and 487 earned a Florida standard high school diploma and who 488 demonstrated readiness for college-level communication and 489 computation skills by any of the approved common placement tests 490 or alternative methods pursuant to this section or a student who 491 is serving as an active duty member of any branch of the United 492 States Armed Services is not required to be assessed for 493 readiness for college-level work in communication and 494 computation and is not required to enroll in developmental 495 education instruction in a Florida College System institution or 496 a school district career center. However, a student who is not 497 required to be assessed for readiness for college-level work in 498 communication and computation and is not required to enroll in 499 developmental education under this paragraph may opt to be 500 assessed and to enroll in developmental education instruction, 501 and the college or school district career center shall provide 502 such assessment and instruction upon the studentâs request. 503 (b)âA student who earned a Florida standard high school 504 diploma and has not demonstrated readiness for college-level 505 courses pursuant to subsection (1) or subsection (2) must be 506 offered the opportunity to be is assessed for readiness for 507 college-level communication and computation and, if the 508 studentâs whose assessment results indicate a need for 509 developmental education, he or she must be advised of all the 510 developmental education options offered at the institution. and, 511 After advisement, the student may enroll in the developmental 512 education option of his or her choice. 513 (c)âA student who demonstrates readiness by achieving or 514 exceeding the test scores established under subsection (1) by 515 the state board and enrolls in a Florida College System 516 institution or a school district career center within 2 years 517 after achieving such scores may shall not be required to retest 518 or complete developmental education when admitted to any Florida 519 College System institution or school district career center. 520 (4)(a)âEach Florida College System institution and school 521 district career center shall implement the developmental 522 education strategies defined in s. 1008.02 and rules established 523 by the State Board of Education. 524 (b)âEach Florida College System institution and school 525 district career center shall use placement test results or 526 alternative methods as established by the State Board of 527 Education to determine the extent to which each student 528 demonstrates sufficient communication and computation skills to 529 indicate readiness for his or her chosen meta-major. Florida 530 College System institutions and school district career centers 531 shall counsel students into college credit courses as quickly as 532 possible, with developmental education limited to that content 533 needed for success in the meta-major. 534 Section 13.âSubsection (1) of section 1008.44, Florida 535 Statutes, is amended to read: 536 1008.44âCAPE Industry Certification Funding List.â 537 (1)âThe State Board of Education shall adopt, at least 538 annually, based upon recommendations by the Commissioner of 539 Education, the CAPE Industry Certification Funding List that 540 assigns categories of certificates and certifications as 541 provided for in s. 1003.4203 to certifications identified in the 542 Master Credentials List under s. 445.004(4) which meet a 543 statewide, regional, or local demand. Supplemental funding for 544 regional and local demand certifications may only be earned in 545 those areas with regional or local demand as identified by the 546 Credentials Review Committee. 547 Section 14.âSubsection (2) of section 1008.47, Florida 548 Statutes, is amended to read: 549 1008.47âPostsecondary education institution accreditation.â 550 (2)âACCREDITATION.â 551 (a)âBy September 1, 2022, The Board of Governors or the 552 State Board of Education, as applicable, shall identify and 553 determine the accrediting agencies or associations best suited 554 to serve as an accreditor for public postsecondary institutions. 555 Such accrediting agencies or associations must be recognized by 556 the database created and maintained by the United States 557 Department of Education. Within 3 years In the year following 558 reaffirmation or fifth-year review by its accrediting agencies 559 or associations, each public postsecondary institution must seek 560 and obtain accreditation from an accrediting agency or 561 association identified by the Board of Governors or State Board 562 of Education, respectively, before its next reaffirmation or 563 fifth-year review date. The requirements in this section are 564 limited to a one-time change in accreditation. The requirements 565 of this subsection are not applicable to those professional, 566 graduate, departmental, or certificate programs at public 567 postsecondary institutions that have specific accreditation 568 requirements or best practices, including, but not limited to, 569 law, pharmacy, engineering, or other similarly situated 570 educational programs. 571 (b)âOnce a public postsecondary institution is required to 572 seek and obtain accreditation from an agency or association 573 identified pursuant to paragraph (a), the institution shall seek 574 accreditation from an a regional accrediting agency or 575 association and provide quarterly reports of its progress to the 576 Board of Governors or State Board of Education, as applicable. 577 If each regional accreditation agency or association identified 578 pursuant to paragraph (a) has refused to grant candidacy status 579 to an institution, the institution must seek and obtain 580 accreditation from any accrediting agency or association that is 581 different from its current accrediting agency or association and 582 is recognized by the database created and maintained by the 583 United States Department of Education. If a public postsecondary 584 institution is not granted candidacy status before its next 585 reaffirmation or fifth-year review date, the institution may 586 remain with its current accrediting agency or association. 587 (c)âThis subsection expires December 31, 2032. 588 Section 15.âPresent subsections (4) through (13) of section 589 1009.21, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (5) 590 through (14), respectively, a new subsection (4) is added to 591 that section, and present subsection (7) of that section is 592 amended, to read: 593 1009.21âDetermination of resident status for tuition 594 purposes.âStudents shall be classified as residents or 595 nonresidents for the purpose of assessing tuition in 596 postsecondary educational programs offered by charter technical 597 career centers or career centers operated by school districts, 598 in Florida College System institutions, and in state 599 universities. 600 (4)âAn individual may not lose his or her resident status 601 for tuition purposes solely by reason of his or her 602 incarceration in a state or federal correctional facility in 603 this state. 604 (8)(7)âA person may shall not lose his or her resident 605 status for tuition purposes solely by reason of his or her 606 serving, or, if such person is a dependent child, by reason of 607 his or her parentâs or parentsâ serving outside this state as 608 active duty or civilian personnel:, 609 (a)âIn the Armed Forces outside this state. 610 (b)âOn assignment for the United States Department of State 611 or Department of Defense. 612 (c)âTeaching at a Department of Defense Dependent School. 613 Section 16.âParagraph (a) of subsection (20) of section 614 1009.26, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 615 1009.26âFee waivers.â 616 (20)(a)âBeginning with the 2026-2027 2022-2023 academic 617 year, a state university shall waive the out-of-state fee for a 618 full-time undergraduate student who: 619 1.âHas a grandparent who is a legal resident as defined in 620 s. 1009.21(1). For purposes of this subsection, the term 621 âgrandparentâ means a person who has a legal relationship to a 622 studentâs parent as the natural or adoptive parent or legal 623 guardian of the studentâs parent. 624 2.âEarns a high school diploma comparable to a Florida 625 standard high school diploma, or its equivalent, or completes a 626 home education program. 627 3.a.âAchieves an SAT combined score no lower than the 89th 628 national percentile on the SAT; 629 b.âAchieves an ACT score concordant to the required SAT 630 score in sub-subparagraph a., using the latest published 631 national concordance table developed jointly by the College 632 Board and ACT, Inc.; or 633 c.âIf a state university accepts the Classic Learning Test 634 (CLT) for admission purposes, achieves a CLT score concordant to 635 the required SAT score specified in sub-subparagraph a., using 636 the latest published scoring comparison developed by Classic 637 Learning Initiatives. 638 4.âBeginning with students who initially enroll in the 2022 639 fall academic term and thereafter, enrolls as a full-time 640 undergraduate student at a state university in the fall academic 641 term immediately following high school graduation. 642 Section 17.âSubsection (3) of section 1009.30, Florida 643 Statutes, is amended to read: 644 1009.30âDual Enrollment Scholarship Program.â 645 (3)(a)âThe program shall reimburse eligible postsecondary 646 institutions for tuition and related instructional materials 647 costs for dual enrollment courses taken during the fall or 648 spring terms by eligible students, consisting of: 649 1.âPrivate school students who take dual enrollment courses 650 pursuant to s. 1007.271(24)(b); 651 2.âHome education program secondary students; or 652 3.âPersonalized education program secondary students. 653 (b)âThe program shall reimburse eligible independent 654 postsecondary institutions for tuition and related instructional 655 materials costs for dual enrollment courses taken by public 656 school students during the fall or spring terms. 657 (c)âThe program shall reimburse institutions for tuition 658 and related instructional materials costs for dual enrollment 659 courses taken by public school, private school, home education 660 program, or personalized education program secondary students 661 during the summer term. 662 Section 18.âSubsection (2) of section 1009.536, Florida 663 Statutes, is amended, and subsection (6) is added to that 664 section, to read: 665 1009.536âFlorida Gold Seal Vocational Scholars and Florida 666 Gold Seal CAPE Scholars awards.âThe Florida Gold Seal Vocational 667 Scholars award and the Florida Gold Seal CAPE Scholars award are 668 created within the Florida Bright Futures Scholarship Program to 669 recognize and reward academic achievement and career preparation 670 by high school students who wish to continue their education. 671 (2)âA student is eligible for a Florida Gold Seal CAPE 672 Scholars award if he or she meets the general eligibility 673 requirements for the Florida Bright Futures Scholarship Program, 674 and the student: 675 (a)âEarns a minimum of 3 5 postsecondary credits credit 676 hours through CAPE industry certifications approved pursuant to 677 s. 1008.44 which articulate for college credit; and 678 (b)âEarns a minimum cumulative weighted grade point average 679 of 2.5, as calculated pursuant to s. 1009.531, on all subjects 680 required for a standard high school diploma, excluding elective 681 courses; and 682 (c)âCompletes at least 30 hours of volunteer service, or 75 683 hours of volunteer service for students entering grade 9 in the 684 2024-2025 school year and thereafter, or 100 hours of paid work, 685 approved by the district school board, the administrators of a 686 nonpublic school, or the Department of Education for home 687 education program students, or 100 hours of a combination of 688 both. The student may identify a social or civic issue or a 689 professional area that interests him or her and develop a plan 690 for his or her personal involvement in addressing the issue or 691 learning about the area. The student must, through papers or 692 other presentations, evaluate and reflect upon his or her 693 experience. Such volunteer service or paid work may include, but 694 is not limited to, a business or governmental internship, work 695 for a nonprofit community service organization, or activities on 696 behalf of a candidate for public office. The hours of volunteer 697 service or paid work must be documented in writing, and the 698 document must be signed by the student, the studentâs parent or 699 guardian, and a representative of the organization for which the 700 student performed the volunteer service or paid work. 701 (6)âBefore or within 3 months after completion of the GATE 702 Program as provided in s. 1004.933, a student may apply for the 703 Florida Gold Seal CAPE Scholars award. 704 Section 19.âParagraph (a) of subsection (4) of section 705 1009.893, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 706 1009.893âBenacquisto Scholarship Program.â 707 (4)âIn order to be eligible for an initial award under the 708 scholarship program, a student must meet the requirements of 709 paragraph (a) or paragraph (b). 710 (a)âA student who is a resident of this state, as 711 determined in s. 1009.40 and rules of the State Board of 712 Education, must: 713 1.âEarn a standard Florida high school diploma or its 714 equivalent pursuant to s. 1002.3105, s. 1003.4281, s. 1003.4282, 715 or s. 1003.435 unless: 716 a.âThe student completes a home education program according 717 to s. 1002.41; or 718 b.âThe student earns a high school diploma from a non 719 Florida school while living with a parent who is on military or 720 public service assignment out of this state; 721 2.âBe accepted by and enroll in a Florida public or 722 independent postsecondary educational institution that is 723 regionally accredited; and 724 3.âBe enrolled full-time in a baccalaureate degree program 725 at an eligible regionally accredited Florida public or 726 independent postsecondary educational institution during the 727 fall academic term following high school graduation. A student 728 may defer the initial scholarship award for up to 1 year. 729 Section 20.âSubsection (5) of section 1009.983, Florida 730 Statutes, is amended to read: 731 1009.983âDirect-support organization; authority.â 732 (5)âThe chair of the board or a designee who possesses 733 knowledge, skill, and experience in the areas of accounting, 734 risk management, or investment management shall serve as a 735 director of the direct-support organization. The chair and the 736 executive director of the board shall jointly name, at a 737 minimum, four other individuals to serve as directors of the 738 organization. 739 Section 21.âParagraph (d) of subsection (3) of section 740 1009.986, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 741 1009.986âFlorida ABLE program.â 742 (3)âDIRECT-SUPPORT ORGANIZATION; FLORIDA ABLE, INC.â 743 (d)1.âThe board of directors of Florida ABLE, Inc., shall 744 consist of: 745 a.âThe chair of the Florida Prepaid College Board, or a his 746 or her designee who possesses knowledge, skill, and experience 747 in the areas of accounting, risk management, or investment 748 management. 749 b.âUp to three individuals who possess knowledge, skill, 750 and experience in the areas of accounting, risk management, or 751 investment management, one of whom may be a current member of 752 the Florida Prepaid College Board, who shall be appointed by the 753 Florida Prepaid College Board. 754 c.âOne individual who possesses knowledge, skill, and 755 experience in the areas of accounting, risk management, or 756 investment management, who shall be appointed by the Governor. 757 d.âTwo individuals who are advocates of persons with 758 disabilities, one of whom shall be appointed by the President of 759 the Senate and one of whom shall be appointed by the Speaker of 760 the House of Representatives. At least one of the individuals 761 appointed under this sub-subparagraph must be an advocate of 762 persons with developmental disabilities, as that term is defined 763 in s. 393.063. 764 2.a.âThe term of the appointees under sub-subparagraph 1.b. 765 shall be up to 3 years as determined by the Florida Prepaid 766 College Board. Such appointees may be reappointed. 767 b.âThe term of the appointees under sub-subparagraphs 1.c. 768 and d. shall be 3 years. Such appointees may be reappointed. 769 3.âUnless authorized by the board of directors of Florida 770 ABLE, Inc., an individual director has no authority to control 771 or direct the operations of Florida ABLE, Inc., or the actions 772 of its officers and employees. 773 4.âThe board of directors of Florida ABLE, Inc.: 774 a.âShall meet at least quarterly and at other times upon 775 the call of the chair. 776 b.âMay use any method of telecommunications to conduct, or 777 establish a quorum at, its meetings or the meetings of a 778 subcommittee or other subdivision if the public is given proper 779 notice of the telecommunications meeting and provided reasonable 780 access to observe and, if appropriate, to participate. 781 c.âShall annually elect a board member to serve as chair. 782 5.âA majority of the total current membership of the board 783 of directors of Florida ABLE, Inc., constitutes a quorum of the 784 board. 785 6.âMembers of the board of directors of Florida ABLE, Inc., 786 and the boardâs subcommittees or other subdivisions shall serve 787 without compensation; however, the members may be reimbursed for 788 reasonable, necessary, and actual travel expenses pursuant to s. 789 112.061. 790 Section 22.âPresent paragraphs (h) and (i) of subsection 791 (17) of section 1011.62, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 792 paragraphs (i) and (j), respectively, and a new paragraph (h) is 793 added to that subsection, to read: 794 1011.62âFunds for operation of schools.âIf the annual 795 allocation from the Florida Education Finance Program to each 796 district for operation of schools is not determined in the 797 annual appropriations act or the substantive bill implementing 798 the annual appropriations act, it shall be determined as 799 follows: 800 (17)âACADEMIC ACCELERATION OPTIONS SUPPLEMENT.âThe academic 801 acceleration options supplement is created to assist school 802 districts in providing academic acceleration options, career 803 themed courses, and courses that lead to digital tool 804 certificates and industry certifications for prekindergarten 805 through grade 12 students and shall be allocated annually in the 806 General Appropriations Act. 807 (h)âCalculation of additional full-time equivalent 808 membership based on the Florida Advanced Courses and Tests 809 (FACT) College Algebra course and test score of students.âA 810 value of 0.16 full-time equivalent student membership shall be 811 calculated for each student in the Florida Advanced Courses and 812 Tests (FACT) College Algebra course who achieves a minimum score 813 on an assessment identified by the Department of Education 814 pursuant to s. 1007.27(2) and added to the total full-time 815 equivalent student membership in basic programs for grades 9 816 through 12 in the subsequent fiscal year. Each district shall 817 allocate at least 80 percent of the funds provided to the 818 district for the FACT College Algebra course instruction, in 819 accordance with this paragraph, to the high school that 820 generates the funds. The school district shall distribute to 821 each classroom teacher who provided the FACT College Algebra 822 course instruction: 823 1.âA bonus in the amount of $50 for each student taught by 824 the FACT College Algebra course teacher in each FACT College 825 Algebra course who achieves a minimum score on an assessment 826 identified by the Department of Education pursuant to s. 827 1007.27(2). 828 2.âAn additional bonus of $500 to each FACT College Algebra 829 course teacher in a school designated with a grade of âDâ or âFâ 830 who has at least one student who achieves a minimum score on an 831 assessment identified by the Department of Education pursuant to 832 s. 1007.27(2), regardless of the number of classes taught or of 833 the number of students who achieve a minimum score on an 834 assessment identified by the Department of Education pursuant to 835 s. 1007.27(2). 836 Section 23.âParagraphs (b) and (e) of subsection (3) of 837 section 1011.84, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 838 1011.84âProcedure for determining state financial support 839 and annual apportionment of state funds to each Florida College 840 System institution district.âThe procedure for determining state 841 financial support and the annual apportionment to each Florida 842 College System institution district authorized to operate a 843 Florida College System institution under the provisions of s. 844 1001.61 shall be as follows: 845 (3)âDETERMINING THE APPORTIONMENT FROM STATE FUNDS.â 846 (b)âThe apportionment to each Florida College System 847 institution from the Florida College System Program Fund shall 848 be determined annually in the General Appropriations Act. In 849 determining each collegeâs apportionment, the Legislature shall 850 consider the following components: 851 1.âBase budget, which includes the state appropriation to 852 the Florida College System Program Fund in the current year plus 853 the related student tuition and out-of-state fees assigned in 854 the current General Appropriations Act. 855 2.âThe cost-to-continue allocation, which consists of 856 incremental changes to the base budget, including salaries, 857 price levels, and other related costs allocated through a 858 funding model developed by the Florida College System presidents 859 in consultation with the Department of Education and approved by 860 the Legislature. The model must which may recognize a minimum 861 level of funding per FTE and differing economic factors arising 862 from the individual educational approaches of the various 863 Florida College System institutions, including, but not limited 864 to: 865 a.âProgram offerings, weighting workforce FTE to account 866 for priorities and costs Direct Instructional Funding, including 867 class size, faculty productivity factors, average faculty 868 salary, ratio of full-time to part-time faculty, costs of 869 programs, and enrollment factors. 870 b.âCompletion of credentials, including certificates, 871 certifications, and degrees Academic Support, including small 872 colleges factor, multicampus factor, and enrollment factor. 873 c.âSize of the college Student Services Support, including 874 headcount of students as well as FTE count and enrollment 875 factors. 876 d.âEconomies of scale Library Support, including volume and 877 other materials/audiovisual requirements. 878 e.âRegional cost differentials Special Projects. 879 f.âOperations and Maintenance of Plant, including square 880 footage and utilization factors. 881 g.âComparable wage factor. 882 3.âStudents enrolled in a recreation and leisure program 883 and students enrolled in a lifelong learning program who may not 884 be counted as full-time equivalent enrollments for purposes of 885 enrollment workload adjustments. 886 4.âOperating costs of new facilities adjustments, which 887 shall be provided, from funds available, for each new facility 888 that is owned by the college and is recommended in accordance 889 with s. 1013.31. 890 5.âNew and improved program enhancements, which shall be 891 determined by the Legislature. 892 893 Student fees in the base budget plus student fee revenues 894 generated by increases in fee rates shall be deducted from the 895 sum of the components determined in subparagraphs 1.-5. The 896 amount remaining shall be the net annual state apportionment to 897 each college. 898 (e)âIf at any time the unencumbered balance in the general 899 fund of the Florida College System institution board of trustees 900 approved operating budget goes below 7 5 percent for a Florida 901 College System institution with a final FTE less than 15,000 for 902 the prior year, or below 7 percent for a Florida College System 903 institution with a final FTE of 15,000 or greater for the prior 904 year, the president must shall provide written notification to 905 the State Board of Education. By September 30 of each year, the 906 chief financial officer of each Florida College System 907 institution shall certify the unexpended amount of state funds 908 remaining in the general fund of an institution as of June 30 of 909 the previous fiscal year. 910 Section 24.âSubsections (2), (3), and (4) of section 911 1013.841, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 912 1013.841âEnd of year balance of Florida College System 913 institution funds.â 914 (2)(a)âEach Florida College System institution with a final 915 FTE less than 15,000 for the prior year shall maintain a minimum 916 carry forward balance of at least 7 5 percent of its state 917 operating budget; however, a Florida College System institution 918 may retain and report to the State Board of Education an annual 919 reserve balance exceeding that amount. If a Florida College 920 System institution fails to maintain a 7 5 percent balance in 921 state operating funds, the president must shall provide written 922 notification to the State Board of Education. 923 (b)âEach Florida College System institution with a final 924 FTE less than 15,000 for the prior year that retains a state 925 operating fund carry forward balance in excess of the 7 5 926 percent minimum shall submit a spending plan for its excess 927 carry forward balance. The spending plan must shall include all 928 excess carry forward funds from state operating funds. The 929 spending plan must shall be submitted to the Florida College 930 System institutionâs board of trustees for approval by September 931 30 of each year, 2020, and each September 30 thereafter. The 932 State Board of Education shall review and publish each Florida 933 College System institutionâs carry forward spending plan by 934 November 15 of each year, 2020, and each November 15 thereafter. 935 (3)(a)âEach Florida College System institution with a final 936 FTE of 15,000 or greater for the prior year shall maintain a 937 minimum carry forward balance of at least 7 percent of its state 938 operating budget. If a Florida College System institution fails 939 to maintain a 7 percent balance in state operating funds, the 940 institution shall submit a plan to the State Board of Education 941 to attain the minimum balance. 942 (b)âEach Florida College System institution with a final 943 FTE of 15,000 or greater for the prior year that retains a state 944 operating fund carry forward balance in excess of the 7 percent 945 minimum shall submit a spending plan for its excess carry 946 forward balance. The spending plan shall include all excess 947 carry forward funds from state operating funds. The spending 948 plan shall be submitted to the Florida College System 949 institutionâs board of trustees for approval by September 30, 950 2020, and each September 30 thereafter. The State Board of 951 Education shall review and publish each Florida College System 952 institutionâs carry forward spending plan by November 15, 2020, 953 and each November 15 thereafter. 954 (4)âA Florida College System institution identified in 955 paragraph (2)(b) (3)(b) must include in its carry forward 956 spending plan the estimated cost per planned expenditure and a 957 timeline for completion of the expenditure. A carry forward 958 spending plan may include retention of the carry forward balance 959 as a reserve fund to be used for authorized expenses in 960 subsequent years. Authorized expenditures in a carry forward 961 spending plan may include: 962 (a)âCommitment of funds to a public education capital 963 outlay project for which an appropriation was previously 964 provided, which requires additional funds for completion, and 965 which is included in the list required by s. 1001.03(18)(d); 966 (b)âCompletion of a renovation, repair, or maintenance 967 project that is consistent with s. 1013.64(1) or replacement of 968 a minor facility; 969 (c)âCompletion of a remodeling or infrastructure project, 970 if such project is survey recommended pursuant to s. 1013.31; 971 (d)âCompletion of a repair or replacement project necessary 972 due to damage caused by a natural disaster for buildings 973 included in the inventory required pursuant to s. 1013.31; 974 (e)âOperating expenditures that support the Florida College 975 System institutionâs mission; 976 (f)âAny purpose approved by the state board or specified in 977 the General Appropriations Act; and 978 (g)âA commitment of funds to a contingency reserve for 979 expenses incurred as a result of a state of emergency declared 980 by the Governor pursuant to s. 252.36. 981 Section 25.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.